Utah statutes.
78A-6-208.   Mental health evaluations -- Duty of administrator.

(1)  The administrator of the juvenile court, with the approval of the board, and the executive director of the Department of Health, and director of the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health shall from time to time agree upon an appropriate plan:

(a)  for obtaining mental health services and health services for the juvenile court from the state and local health departments and programs of mental health; and

(b)  for assistance by the Department of Health and the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health in securing for the juvenile court special health, mental health, juvenile competency evaluations, and related services including community mental health services not already available from the Department of Health and the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health.

(2)  The Legislature may provide an appropriation to the Department of Health and the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health for this purpose.



Amended by Chapter 316, 2012 General Session

